District of Columbia statutes.
25-602

Filing a protest — Timing and requirements.

(a)

Any person objecting, under § 25-601, to the approval of an application shall notify the Board in writing of his or her intention to object and the grounds for the objection within the protest period.

(b)

If the Board has reason to believe that the applicant did not comply fully with the notice requirements set forth in subchapter II of Chapter 4, it shall extend the protest period as needed to ensure that the public has been given notice and has had adequate opportunity to respond.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-602.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.